Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7208
Quality assessment and quality improvement activities; oversight.

The chief medical officer or clinical director of the health carrier shall have primary responsibility for the quality assessment and quality improvement activities carried out by, or on behalf of, the health carrier and for ensuring that all requirements of the Quality Assessment and Improvement Act are met. The chief medical officer or clinical director shall approve the written quality assessment and quality improvement programs, as applicable, implemented in compliance with the act, and shall periodically review and revise the program document and act to assure ongoing appropriateness. Not less than semiannually, the chief medical officer or clinical director shall review reports of quality assessment and quality improvement activities. The director shall hold the health carrier responsible for the actions of the chief medical officer or clinical director carried out on behalf of the health carrier and shall hold the health carrier responsible for ensuring that all requirements of the act are met.

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 58.